Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1002
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature
hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to utilize Nebraska's
tax structure in order to encourage new businesses to relocate to Nebraska
as a component of a program to develop new tourism attractions as well as
to redevelop areas of municipalities which are suffering the effects of age.
In addition, the policy of this state is to promote the creation and retention
of new jobs in Nebraska and attract and retain Nebraska's best and brightest
young people.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 2.